Washington statutes.
RCW 36.80.080

Cost-audit examination by state auditor—Expense.

The state auditor shall annually make a cost-audit examination of the books and records of the county road engineer and make a written report thereon to the county legislative authority. The expense of the examination shall be paid from the county road fund.

[ 1995 c 301 s 69; 1985 c 120 s 3; 1984 c 7 s 34; 1963 c 4 s 36.80.080. Prior: 1957 c 146 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1985 c 120 s 3: "Section 3 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1987." [ 1985 c 120 s 4.]